Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9511
Direct provider; primary care services; payment.

A direct provider may provide primary care services to a patient who is not a party to a direct agreement with that provider and may receive payment for the services.

Laws 2016, LB817, § 11.